Florida, session 2026, SB1528.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 12 13 Section 1.âSection 121.082, Florida Statutes, is created to 14 read: 15 121.082âTransferability of prior service.â 16 (1)âThe department shall adopt rules to establish a process 17 for an employee to transfer years of creditable service to 18 another employee. 19 (2)âAt a minimum, such rules must provide for all of the 20 following: 21 (a)âThat an employee is eligible to transfer years of 22 creditable service after 1 year of employment with an employer. 23 (b)âThat participation is voluntary. 24 (c)âThat the employee transferring years of service is a 25 member of the same retirement classification as the receiving 26 employee. 27 (d)âThat years of service transferred to another employee 28 are removed from the employee contributing the years of service. 29 (e)âThat the transfer of years of service is irrevocable. 30 (f)âThat the receiving employee is liable for any unfunded 31 actuarial liability that results from an increase in his or her 32 creditable years of service. 33 (g)âThat employees who transfer service are prohibited from 34 claiming past service or prior service under s. 121.081. 35 (h)âThat employees who transfer service may not reenroll in 36 the Florida Retirement System. 37 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.